Hawaii statutes.
§12-5 Nomination papers: number of
signers. (a) Nomination papers for candidates for members of Congress,
governor, and lieutenant governor shall be signed by not less than twenty-five
registered voters of the State or of the Congressional district from which the
candidates are running in the case of candidates for the United States House of
Representatives.

(b) Nomination papers for candidates for
either branch of the legislature and for county office shall be signed by not
less than fifteen registered voters of the district or county or subdivision
thereof for which the person nominated is a candidate.

(c) Nomination papers for candidates for
members of the board of trustees of the office of Hawaiian affairs shall be
signed by not less than twenty-five persons registered to vote.

(d) No signatures shall be required on
nomination papers for candidates filing to run in a special primary or special
election to fill a vacancy. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1979, c 196, §6; am L
1990, c 35, §7; am L 2011, c 5, §7; am L 2012, c 225, §5]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next